Oklahoma, session 2025, SB975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1711, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1711. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority, subject to the


provisions hereof, is hereby authorized to fix, revise, charge and


collect tolls for the use of each turnpike project and the different


parts or sections thereof, except for use by law enforcement


officers responsible for enforcing the traffic laws and the general


laws of the state and federal governments on turnpikes, who shall be


entitled to free use of every such project in the performance of


official duties connected with such turnpike project, and to


contract with any person, partnership, association, or corporation


desiring the use of any part thereof, including the right-of-way

Req. No. 797 Page 1


adjoining the paved portion, for placing thereon telephone,


telegraph, electric light or power lines, gas stations, garages,


stores, hotels, restaurants, and advertising signs, or for any other


purpose except for tracks for railroad or railway use, and to fix


the terms, conditions, rents, and rates of charges for such use.


Such tolls, subject to the other restrictions hereof, shall be so


fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate of tolls from the


turnpike project or projects in connection with which the bonds of


any issue shall have been issued pursuant to Section 2 of this act


as to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues, if any, to pay


(a) the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating such turnpike


project or projects, and (b) the principal of and the interest of


such bonds as the same shall become due and payable, and to create


reserves for such purposes. The tolls and all other revenues


derived from the turnpike project or projects in connection with


which the bonds of any issue shall have been issued, except such


part thereof as may be necessary to pay such cost of maintenance,


repair, and operation and to provide such reserves therefor as may


be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such


bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same shall be set aside


at such regular intervals as may be provided in such resolution or


such trust agreement in a sinking fund which is hereby pledged to,


and charged with, the payment of (a) the interest upon such bonds as


such interest shall fall due, (b) the principal of such bonds as the

Req. No. 797 Page 2


same shall fall due, (c) the necessary charges of paying agents for


paying principal and interest, and (d) the redemption price or the


purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein


provided, which are a charge against such fund. The use and


disposition of monies to the credit of such sinking fund shall be


subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance


of such bonds or of such trust agreement. Except as may otherwise


be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement, such sinking


fund shall be a fund for all such bonds without distinction or


priority of one over another. The monies in the sinking fund, less


such reserve as may be provided in such resolution or trust


agreement, if not used within a reasonable time for the purchase of


bonds for cancellation as above provided, shall be applied to the


redemption of bonds at the redemption price then applicable. Any


person who leases, rents, or acquires control of any gas station,


garage, store, hotel, or restaurant must have been a resident of, or


been doing business in, Oklahoma for the past five (5) years.


Notwithstanding anything else herein contained to the contrary, the


Corporation Commission of the State of Oklahoma shall exercise the


jurisdiction now or hereafter vested in it to regulate and control


the operation of motor carriers of passengers and freight, using or


desiring to use any turnpike project, in the manner and to the


extent that it regulates or controls such carriers using the


highways of the state. The Authority shall not discriminate against

Req. No. 797 Page 3


any group or class or individual member thereof in fixing the amount


of toll tolls, rents, or charge charges for the use of the turnpike


project.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1711.1 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority shall have legislative


approval before increasing toll rates on any turnpikes in this


state. The Legislature shall give approval by joint resolution for


any increase in rates.


B. The Legislature shall not give approval to any toll rate


increase that gives more than a ten percent (10%) discount to


members of a specific class.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-797 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:47:01 AM

















Req. No. 797 Page 4